Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 8. Foreclosure Deferment

38-38-801.
to 38-38-808. (Repealed)

Editor’s note:

(1) This part 8 was added in 2009. For amendments to this part 8 prior to its repeal in 2015, consult the 2014 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

(2) Section 38-38-808 provided for the repeal of this part 8, effective September 1, 2015. (See

L

. 2014, p. 552.)